Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.220

Military department active state service account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The military department active state service account is created in the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in the account from legislative appropriations and transfers, federal appropriations, or any other lawful source. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for claims and expenses for the organized militia called into active state service to perform duties under RCW 38.08.040 that are not paid under RCW 38.24.010 from nonappropriated funds, including but not limited to claims and expenses arising from anticipated planning, training, exercises, and other administrative duties that are not of an emergency nature.

[ 2008 c 44 s 1.]